Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 12. Planning Assistance.

Sec. 44.33.781.
Planning assistance for development and maintenance of district coastal management plans. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 44.33.782.
Planning assistance to platting authorities.

To facilitate planning in municipalities that exercise planning and zoning authority, the department may provide planning assistance, including but not limited to surveys, land use studies, urban renewal plans, technical services, model acts that include regulations designed to encourage development and use of energy systems not dependent on oil or gas, and other planning work to a city, borough, or other platting authority. In an area under the jurisdiction, for planning purposes, of a city, borough, or other platting authority, the department may not perform the planning work except at the request or with the consent of the local authority.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.784.
Assistance by cities and platting authorities.

A city or platting authority may make funds under its control available to the department for the purposes of obtaining planning work or planning assistance, or both, for its area. The department may contract for, accept, and expend the funds for urban planning for the local jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.786.
Land use planning and state facility procurement plan.

The department shall make recommendations to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities and to appropriate program agencies concerning the effect upon the comprehensive plan or other land use plans or proposals of municipalities and unincorporated communities with respect to the facility procurement plan required to be prepared in accordance with AS

35.10.170

.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.788.
Other planning powers.

The department may accept and expend grants from the federal government and other public or private sources, may contract with reference to them, and may enter into contracts and exercise all other powers necessary to carry out AS

44.33.782

—

44.33.788

.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.33.790.
Definition.

In AS

44.33.782

—

44.33.790

, “department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 12 ch 31 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.800.
International trade. [Repealed, E.O. No. 112 § 3 (2004). For current law, see AS 44.19.017.]